resources_js/ar_SA/aspell/ar_affix.dat
# This file was created automatically on 6/22/2006.  Do not edit!
# It was created with:
#   perl aspell-source-from-Buckwalter.pl . . .
SET UTF-8

# Pref-Wa
PFX ے Y 2
PFX ے 0 و .
PFX ے 0 ف .

# IVPref-hmA-tu
PFX ü Y 6
PFX ü 0 وست .
PFX ü 0 فست .
PFX ü 0 فت .
PFX ü 0 وت .
PFX ü 0 ست .
PFX ü 0 ت .

# IVPref-hw-ya
PFX û Y 6
PFX û 0 ي .
PFX û 0 سي .
PFX û 0 في .
PFX û 0 فسي .
PFX û 0 وسي .
PFX û 0 وي .

# IVPref-nHn-linu
PFX ْ Y 3
PFX ْ 0 ولن .
PFX ْ 0 لن .
PFX ْ 0 فلن .

# IVPref-hy-litu
PFX ù Y 3
PFX ù 0 لت .
PFX ù 0 ولت .
PFX ù 0 فلت .

# IVPref-AntmA-lita
PFX ّ Y 3
PFX ّ 0 لت .
PFX ّ 0 ولت .
PFX ّ 0 فلت .

# IVPref-hn-ya
PFX ÷ Y 6
PFX ÷ 0 ي .
PFX ÷ 0 سي .
PFX ÷ 0 في .
PFX ÷ 0 فسي .
PFX ÷ 0 وسي .
PFX ÷ 0 وي .

# NPref-LiAl
PFX ِ Y 3
PFX ِ 0 ل .
PFX ِ 0 فل .
PFX ِ 0 ول .

# IVPref-hmA-litu
PFX ُ Y 3
PFX ُ 0 لت .
PFX ُ 0 ولت .
PFX ُ 0 فلت .

# IVPref-Anta-litu
PFX ô Y 3
PFX ô 0 لت .
PFX ô 0 ولت .
PFX ô 0 فلت .

# IVPref-hm-liya
PFX َ Y 3
PFX َ 0 ولي .
PFX َ 0 فلي .
PFX َ 0 لي .

# NPref-Al
PFX ٍ Y 3
PFX ٍ 0 فال .
PFX ٍ 0 ال .
PFX ٍ 0 وال .

# IVPref-Antn-tu
PFX ٌ Y 6
PFX ٌ 0 وست .
PFX ٌ 0 فست .
PFX ٌ 0 فت .
PFX ٌ 0 وت .
PFX ٌ 0 ست .
PFX ٌ 0 ت .

# IVPref-Antn-ta
PFX ً Y 6
PFX ً 0 وست .
PFX ً 0 فست .
PFX ً 0 فت .
PFX ً 0 وت .
PFX ً 0 ست .
PFX ً 0 ت .

# IVPref-Anta-ta
PFX ï Y 6
PFX ï 0 وست .
PFX ï 0 فست .
PFX ï 0 فت .
PFX ï 0 وت .
PFX ï 0 ست .
PFX ï 0 ت .

# IVPref-hn-liyu
PFX ی Y 3
PFX ی 0 ولي .
PFX ی 0 فلي .
PFX ی 0 لي .

# NPref-Li
PFX ي Y 3
PFX ي 0 ل .
PFX ي 0 فل .
PFX ي 0 ول .

# IVPref-Anti-tu
PFX ى Y 6
PFX ى 0 وست .
PFX ى 0 فست .
PFX ى 0 فت .
PFX ى 0 وت .
PFX ى 0 ست .
PFX ى 0 ت .

# IVPref-hmA-liyu
PFX ë Y 3
PFX ë 0 ولي .
PFX ë 0 فلي .
PFX ë 0 لي .

# IVPref-AnA->u
PFX ê Y 12
PFX ê 0 سا .
PFX ê 0 ا .
PFX ê 0 فسأ .
PFX ê 0 أ .
PFX ê 0 فا .
PFX ê 0 وسأ .
PFX ê 0 وأ .
PFX ê 0 وا .
PFX ê 0 وسا .
PFX ê 0 سأ .
PFX ê 0 فسا .
PFX ê 0 فأ .

# IVPref-hm-yu
PFX é Y 6
PFX é 0 ي .
PFX é 0 سي .
PFX é 0 في .
PFX é 0 فسي .
PFX é 0 وسي .
PFX é 0 وي .

# IVPref-hmA-liya
PFX è Y 3
PFX è 0 ولي .
PFX è 0 فلي .
PFX è 0 لي .

# IVPref-nHn-nu
PFX ç Y 6
PFX ç 0 وسن .
PFX ç 0 ون .
PFX ç 0 ن .
PFX ç 0 فسن .
PFX ç 0 سن .
PFX ç 0 فن .

# IVPref-AntmA-litu
PFX و Y 3
PFX و 0 لت .
PFX و 0 ولت .
PFX و 0 فلت .

# IVPref-Anti-ta
PFX ه Y 6
PFX ه 0 وست .
PFX ه 0 فست .
PFX ه 0 فت .
PFX ه 0 وت .
PFX ه 0 ست .
PFX ه 0 ت .

# IVPref-hw-liya
PFX ن Y 3
PFX ن 0 ولي .
PFX ن 0 فلي .
PFX ن 0 لي .

# IVPref-AnA-li>u
PFX م Y 6
PFX م 0 فلأ .
PFX م 0 ولا .
PFX م 0 لأ .
PFX م 0 لا .
PFX م 0 ولأ .
PFX م 0 فلا .

# IVPref-Anta-lita
PFX â Y 3
PFX â 0 لت .
PFX â 0 ولت .
PFX â 0 فلت .

# IVPref-AnA->a
PFX ل Y 12
PFX ل 0 سا .
PFX ل 0 ا .
PFX ل 0 فسأ .
PFX ل 0 أ .
PFX ل 0 فا .
PFX ل 0 وسأ .
PFX ل 0 وأ .
PFX ل 0 وا .
PFX ل 0 وسا .
PFX ل 0 سأ .
PFX ل 0 فسا .
PFX ل 0 فأ .

# IVPref-hw-liyu
PFX à Y 3
PFX à 0 ولي .
PFX à 0 فلي .
PFX à 0 لي .

# IVPref-AnA-|
PFX ك Y 12
PFX ك 0 سا .
PFX ك 0 ا .
PFX ك 0 سآ .
PFX ك 0 آ .
PFX ك 0 فا .
PFX ك 0 وآ .
PFX ك 0 وا .
PFX ك 0 وسا .
PFX ك 0 فآ .
PFX ك 0 فسآ .
PFX ك 0 فسا .
PFX ك 0 وسآ .

# NPref-La
PFX ق Y 1
PFX ق 0 ل .

# IVPref-hmA-ta
PFX ف Y 6
PFX ف 0 وست .
PFX ف 0 فست .
PFX ف 0 فت .
PFX ف 0 وت .
PFX ف 0 ست .
PFX ف 0 ت .

# IVPref-Antn-litu
PFX ـ Y 3
PFX ـ 0 لت .
PFX ـ 0 ولت .
PFX ـ 0 فلت .

# IVPref-hmA-ya
PFX غ Y 6
PFX غ 0 ي .
PFX غ 0 سي .
PFX غ 0 في .
PFX غ 0 فسي .
PFX غ 0 وسي .
PFX غ 0 وي .

# IVPref-hn-liya
PFX ع Y 3
PFX ع 0 ولي .
PFX ع 0 فلي .
PFX ع 0 لي .

# IVPref-hy-tu
PFX ظ Y 6
PFX ظ 0 وست .
PFX ظ 0 فست .
PFX ظ 0 فت .
PFX ظ 0 وت .
PFX ظ 0 ست .
PFX ظ 0 ت .

# IVPref-AnA-li>a
PFX ط Y 6
PFX ط 0 فلأ .
PFX ط 0 ولا .
PFX ط 0 لأ .
PFX ط 0 لا .
PFX ط 0 ولأ .
PFX ط 0 فلا .

# NPref-Bi
PFX × Y 6
PFX × 0 وك .
PFX × 0 وب .
PFX × 0 ك .
PFX × 0 ب .
PFX × 0 فب .
PFX × 0 فك .

# IVPref-Antm-tu
PFX ض Y 6
PFX ض 0 وست .
PFX ض 0 فست .
PFX ض 0 فت .
PFX ض 0 وت .
PFX ض 0 ست .
PFX ض 0 ت .

# IVPref-Antm-ta
PFX ص Y 6
PFX ص 0 وست .
PFX ص 0 فست .
PFX ص 0 فت .
PFX ص 0 وت .
PFX ص 0 ست .
PFX ص 0 ت .

# IVPref-Anti-litu
PFX ش Y 3
PFX ش 0 لت .
PFX ش 0 ولت .
PFX ش 0 فلت .

# IVPref-hy-ta
PFX س Y 6
PFX س 0 وست .
PFX س 0 فست .
PFX س 0 فت .
PFX س 0 وت .
PFX س 0 ست .
PFX س 0 ت .

# PVPref-La
PFX ز Y 1
PFX ز 0 ل .

# IVPref-AntmA-ta
PFX ر Y 6
PFX ر 0 وست .
PFX ر 0 فست .
PFX ر 0 فت .
PFX ر 0 وت .
PFX ر 0 ست .
PFX ر 0 ت .

# IVPref-nHn-na
PFX ذ Y 6
PFX ذ 0 وسن .
PFX ذ 0 ون .
PFX ذ 0 ن .
PFX ذ 0 فسن .
PFX ذ 0 سن .
PFX ذ 0 فن .

# IVPref-Antn-lita
PFX د Y 3
PFX د 0 لت .
PFX د 0 ولت .
PFX د 0 فلت .

# IVPref-hn-yu
PFX خ Y 6
PFX خ 0 ي .
PFX خ 0 سي .
PFX خ 0 في .
PFX خ 0 فسي .
PFX خ 0 وسي .
PFX خ 0 وي .

# IVPref-hm-liyu
PFX ح Y 3
PFX ح 0 ولي .
PFX ح 0 فلي .
PFX ح 0 لي .

# IVPref-hy-lita
PFX ج Y 3
PFX ج 0 لت .
PFX ج 0 ولت .
PFX ج 0 فلت .

# IVPref-hmA-yu
PFX ث Y 6
PFX ث 0 ي .
PFX ث 0 سي .
PFX ث 0 في .
PFX ث 0 فسي .
PFX ث 0 وسي .
PFX ث 0 وي .

# IVPref-AnA-li|
PFX ت Y 6
PFX ت 0 ولا .
PFX ت 0 فلآ .
PFX ت 0 لا .
PFX ت 0 ولآ .
PFX ت 0 لآ .
PFX ت 0 فلا .

# IVPref-Anti-lita
PFX ة Y 3
PFX ة 0 لت .
PFX ة 0 ولت .
PFX ة 0 فلت .

# NPref-Lil
PFX ب Y 3
PFX ب 0 لل .
PFX ب 0 فلل .
PFX ب 0 ولل .

# IVPref-hw-yu
PFX ا Y 6
PFX ا 0 ي .
PFX ا 0 سي .
PFX ا 0 في .
PFX ا 0 فسي .
PFX ا 0 وسي .
PFX ا 0 وي .

# IVPref-Antm-lita
PFX ئ Y 3
PFX ئ 0 لت .
PFX ئ 0 ولت .
PFX ئ 0 فلت .

# NPref-BiAl
PFX إ Y 6
PFX إ 0 كال .
PFX إ 0 فكال .
PFX إ 0 فبال .
PFX إ 0 بال .
PFX إ 0 وبال .
PFX إ 0 وكال .

# IVPref-Antm-litu
PFX ؤ Y 3
PFX ؤ 0 لت .
PFX ؤ 0 ولت .
PFX ؤ 0 فلت .

# IVPref-hmA-lita
PFX أ Y 3
PFX أ 0 لت .
PFX أ 0 ولت .
PFX أ 0 فلت .

# IVPref-AntmA-tu
PFX آ Y 6
PFX آ 0 وست .
PFX آ 0 فست .
PFX آ 0 فت .
PFX آ 0 وت .
PFX آ 0 ست .
PFX آ 0 ت .

# IVPref-hm-ya
PFX ء Y 6
PFX ء 0 ي .
PFX ء 0 سي .
PFX ء 0 في .
PFX ء 0 فسي .
PFX ء 0 وسي .
PFX ء 0 وي .

# IVPref-Anta-tu
PFX ہ Y 6
PFX ہ 0 وست .
PFX ہ 0 فست .
PFX ہ 0 فت .
PFX ہ 0 وت .
PFX ہ 0 ست .
PFX ہ 0 ت .

# IVPref-nHn-lina
PFX ؟ Y 3
PFX ؟ 0 ولن .
PFX ؟ 0 لن .
PFX ؟ 0 فلن .

# IVSuff-yh
SFX ¾ Y 7
SFX ¾ 0 يهن .
SFX ¾ 0 يني .
SFX ¾ 0 يهما .
SFX ¾ 0 ينا .
SFX ¾ 0 يهم .
SFX ¾ 0 يه .
SFX ¾ 0 يها .

# IVSuff-ynh
SFX ½ Y 7
SFX ½ 0 يننا .
SFX ½ 0 ينهما .
SFX ½ 0 ينها .
SFX ½ 0 ينه .
SFX ½ 0 ينني .
SFX ½ 0 ينهم .
SFX ½ 0 ينهن .

# FWSuff-k
SFX ¼ Y 4
SFX ¼ 0 كما .
SFX ¼ 0 كم .
SFX ¼ 0 ك .
SFX ¼ 0 كن .

# IVSuff-k
SFX » Y 4
SFX » 0 كما .
SFX » 0 كم .
SFX » 0 ك .
SFX » 0 كن .

# CVSuff-wA
SFX ؛ Y 1
SFX ؛ 0 وا .

# NSuff-ap
SFX ¹ Y 1
SFX ¹ 0 ة .

# IVSuff-~nh
SFX ¸ Y 7
SFX ¸ 0 ني .
SFX ¸ 0 هما .
SFX ¸ 0 ها .
SFX ¸ 0 ه .
SFX ¸ 0 نا .
SFX ¸ 0 هن .
SFX ¸ 0 هم .

# IVSuff-|k
SFX · Y 4
SFX · 0 كما .
SFX · 0 كم .
SFX · 0 ك .
SFX · 0 كن .

# PVSuff-A
SFX ¶ Y 1
SFX ¶ 0 ا .

# NSuff-tayn
SFX ´ Y 1
SFX ´ 0 تين .

# IVSuff-Ah
SFX ³ Y 7
SFX ³ 0 اهن .
SFX ³ 0 اهم .
SFX ³ 0 اها .
SFX ³ 0 اهما .
SFX ³ 0 انا .
SFX ³ 0 اني .
SFX ³ 0 اه .

# IVSuff-Anh
SFX ² Y 7
SFX ² 0 انهن .
SFX ² 0 انهما .
SFX ² 0 اننا .
SFX ² 0 انها .
SFX ² 0 انهم .
SFX ² 0 انه .
SFX ² 0 انني .

# IVSuff-yn
SFX ± Y 1
SFX ± 0 ين .

# NSuff-ayh
SFX ° Y 11
SFX ° 0 يكم .
SFX ° 0 يكما .
SFX ° 0 ي .
SFX ° 0 يهن .
SFX ° 0 يهما .
SFX ° 0 ينا .
SFX ° 0 يكن .
SFX ° 0 يه .
SFX ° 0 يهم .
SFX ° 0 يها .
SFX ° 0 يك .

# IVSuff-awnh
SFX ¯ Y 7
SFX ¯ 0 وننا .
SFX ¯ 0 ونني .
SFX ¯ 0 ونهم .
SFX ¯ 0 ونها .
SFX ¯ 0 ونهما .
SFX ¯ 0 ونه .
SFX ¯ 0 ونهن .

# NSuff-|t
SFX ® Y 1
SFX ® 0 آت .

# IVSuff-Ak
SFX ­ Y 4
SFX ­ 0 اكن .
SFX ­ 0 اكما .
SFX ­ 0 اكم .
SFX ­ 0 اك .

# NSuff-atAh
SFX ¬ Y 12
SFX ¬ 0 تاي .
SFX ¬ 0 تاها .
SFX ¬ 0 تاكم .
SFX ¬ 0 تاكما .
SFX ¬ 0 تاهما .
SFX ¬ 0 تاهن .
SFX ¬ 0 تاه .
SFX ¬ 0 تانا .
SFX ¬ 0 تاكن .
SFX ¬ 0 تاهم .
SFX ¬ 0 تاك .
SFX ¬ 0 تا .

# IVSuff-An
SFX « Y 1
SFX « 0 ان .

# NSuff-h
SFX ھ Y 10
SFX ھ 0 كما .
SFX ھ 0 كم .
SFX ھ 0 كن .
SFX ھ 0 هن .
SFX ھ 0 هم .
SFX ھ 0 هما .
SFX ھ 0 ه .
SFX ھ 0 ها .
SFX ھ 0 ك .
SFX ھ 0 نا .

# IVSuff-nh
SFX © Y 7
SFX © 0 نهن .
SFX © 0 نني .
SFX © 0 نهما .
SFX © 0 نها .
SFX © 0 نه .
SFX © 0 ننا .
SFX © 0 نهم .

# NSuff-ath
SFX ¨ Y 11
SFX ¨ 0 تهم .
SFX ¨ 0 تها .
SFX ¨ 0 تهن .
SFX ¨ 0 تهما .
SFX ¨ 0 تنا .
SFX ¨ 0 تكما .
SFX ¨ 0 تكم .
SFX ¨ 0 تي .
SFX ¨ 0 ته .
SFX ¨ 0 تك .
SFX ¨ 0 تكن .

# PVSuff-~nh
SFX § Y 20
SFX § 0 كما .
SFX § 0 كم .
SFX § 0 هن .
SFX § 0 اه .
SFX § 0 اهم .
SFX § 0 اها .
SFX § 0 هما .
SFX § 0 ه .
SFX § 0 ك .
SFX § 0 نا .
SFX § 0 اك .
SFX § 0 كن .
SFX § 0 اكم .
SFX § 0 هم .
SFX § 0 اهن .
SFX § 0 ني .
SFX § 0 اكن .
SFX § 0 ها .
SFX § 0 اهما .
SFX § 0 اكما .

# IVSuff-y
SFX ¦ Y 1
SFX ¦ 0 ي .

# NSuff-An
SFX ¥ Y 1
SFX ¥ 0 ان .

# NSuff-|-ni
SFX ¤ Y 1
SFX ¤ 0 ن .

# IVSuff-wk
SFX £ Y 4
SFX £ 0 وكن .
SFX £ 0 وك .
SFX £ 0 وكما .
SFX £ 0 وكم .

# FWSuff-iy-I
SFX ¢ Y 1
SFX ¢ 0 ي .

# IVSuff-~nk
SFX ، Y 4
SFX ، 0 كما .
SFX ، 0 كم .
SFX ، 0 ك .
SFX ، 0 كن .

# PVSuff-th
SFX ں Y 32
SFX ں 0 تمونا .
SFX ں 0 تمانا .
SFX ں 0 تماهما .
SFX ں 0 تموني .
SFX ں 0 تنني .
SFX ں 0 تنها .
SFX ں 0 تهن .
SFX ں 0 تموهم .
SFX ں 0 تماه .
SFX ں 0 تني .
SFX ں 0 تنا .
SFX ں 0 تماني .
SFX ں 0 تماهم .
SFX ں 0 ته .
SFX ں 0 تنهن .
SFX ں 0 تهم .
SFX ں 0 تها .
SFX ں 0 تنهما .
SFX ں 0 تنهم .
SFX ں 0 تموها .
SFX ں 0 تموه .
SFX ں 0 تهما .
SFX ں 0 تماهن .
SFX ں 0 تننا .
SFX ں 0 تموهما .
SFX ں 0 تكما .
SFX ں 0 تموهن .
SFX ں 0 تكم .
SFX ں 0 تنه .
SFX ں 0 تماها .
SFX ں 0 تكن .
SFX ں 0 تك .

# PVSuff-nh
SFX ڑ Y 20
SFX ڑ 0 ناهن .
SFX ڑ 0 نكم .
SFX ڑ 0 نه .
SFX ڑ 0 ناكما .
SFX ڑ 0 ناهم .
SFX ڑ 0 نكن .
SFX ڑ 0 ناه .
SFX ڑ 0 نهم .
SFX ڑ 0 ناهما .
SFX ڑ 0 نهن .
SFX ڑ 0 ناك .
SFX ڑ 0 ناها .
SFX ڑ 0 نك .
SFX ڑ 0 ناكن .
SFX ڑ 0 نني .
SFX ڑ 0 نهما .
SFX ڑ 0 نها .
SFX ڑ 0 نكما .
SFX ڑ 0 ناكم .
SFX ڑ 0 ننا .

# NSuff-|th
SFX ک Y 11
SFX ک 0 آتي .
SFX ک 0 آتك .
SFX ک 0 آتهم .
SFX ک 0 آتكن .
SFX ک 0 آتنا .
SFX ک 0 آتهن .
SFX ک 0 آتها .
SFX ک 0 آتكم .
SFX ک 0 آتكما .
SFX ک 0 آتهما .
SFX ک 0 آته .

# NSuff-|h
SFX گ Y 11
SFX گ 0 كما .
SFX گ 0 كم .
SFX گ 0 كن .
SFX گ 0 هن .
SFX گ 0 هم .
SFX گ 0 ي .
SFX گ 0 هما .
SFX گ 0 ه .
SFX گ 0 ها .
SFX گ 0 ك .
SFX گ 0 نا .

# NSuff-iyh
SFX ڈ Y 11
SFX ڈ 0 يكم .
SFX ڈ 0 يكما .
SFX ڈ 0 ي .
SFX ڈ 0 يهن .
SFX ڈ 0 يهما .
SFX ڈ 0 ينا .
SFX ڈ 0 يكن .
SFX ڈ 0 يه .
SFX ڈ 0 يهم .
SFX ڈ 0 يها .
SFX ڈ 0 يك .

# PVSuff-~t
SFX ژ Y 3
SFX ژ 0 ن .
SFX ژ 0 ما .
SFX ژ 0 م .

# IVSuff-|nk
SFX چ Y 4
SFX چ 0 نكم .
SFX چ 0 نك .
SFX چ 0 نكن .
SFX چ 0 نكما .

# PVSuff-Ah
SFX ٹ Y 11
SFX ٹ 0 اكم .
SFX ٹ 0 اه .
SFX ٹ 0 اهم .
SFX ٹ 0 اهن .
SFX ٹ 0 اها .
SFX ٹ 0 اكن .
SFX ٹ 0 اهما .
SFX ٹ 0 انا .
SFX ٹ 0 اني .
SFX ٹ 0 اكما .
SFX ٹ 0 اك .

# NSuff-At
SFX پ Y 1
SFX پ 0 ات .

# NSuff-wn
SFX  Y 1
SFX  0 ون .

# FWSuff-niy-I
SFX ~ Y 1
SFX ~ 0 ني .

# IVSuff-nk
SFX } Y 4
SFX } 0 نكم .
SFX } 0 نك .
SFX } 0 نكن .
SFX } 0 نكما .

# IVSuff-ny-nA
SFX | Y 2
SFX | 0 ني .
SFX | 0 نا .

# NSuff-Ath
SFX { Y 11
SFX { 0 اتها .
SFX { 0 اتنا .
SFX { 0 اته .
SFX { 0 اتك .
SFX { 0 اتهم .
SFX { 0 اتكم .
SFX { 0 اتي .
SFX { 0 اتهن .
SFX { 0 اتكما .
SFX { 0 اتكن .
SFX { 0 اتهما .

# IVSuff-|n
SFX z Y 1
SFX z 0 ن .

# IVSuff-wnk
SFX y Y 4
SFX y 0 ونكم .
SFX y 0 ونك .
SFX y 0 ونكما .
SFX y 0 ونكن .

# PVSuff-awA
SFX x Y 1
SFX x 0 وا .

# FWSuff-niy-me
SFX w Y 1
SFX w 0 ني .

# PVSuff-ah
SFX v Y 11
SFX v 0 كما .
SFX v 0 كم .
SFX v 0 كن .
SFX v 0 هن .
SFX v 0 هم .
SFX v 0 ني .
SFX v 0 هما .
SFX v 0 ه .
SFX v 0 ها .
SFX v 0 ك .
SFX v 0 نا .

# IVSuff-Ank
SFX u Y 4
SFX u 0 انكما .
SFX u 0 انكم .
SFX u 0 انك .
SFX u 0 انكن .

# IVSuff-n
SFX t Y 1
SFX t 0 ن .

# PVSuff-~n
SFX s Y 1
SFX s 0 ا .

# IVSuff-wnh
SFX r Y 7
SFX r 0 وننا .
SFX r 0 ونني .
SFX r 0 ونهم .
SFX r 0 ونها .
SFX r 0 ونهما .
SFX r 0 ونه .
SFX r 0 ونهن .

# CVSuff-wh
SFX q Y 7
SFX q 0 ونا .
SFX q 0 وها .
SFX q 0 وه .
SFX q 0 وني .
SFX q 0 وهم .
SFX q 0 وهن .
SFX q 0 وهما .

# NSuff-atAn
SFX p Y 1
SFX p 0 تان .

# CVSuff-oh
SFX o Y 7
SFX o 0 ني .
SFX o 0 هما .
SFX o 0 ها .
SFX o 0 ه .
SFX o 0 نا .
SFX o 0 هن .
SFX o 0 هم .

# FWSuff-~A
SFX n Y 1
SFX n 0 ا .

# FWSuff-nA-us
SFX m Y 1
SFX m 0 نا .

# IVSuff-awk
SFX l Y 4
SFX l 0 وكن .
SFX l 0 وك .
SFX l 0 وكما .
SFX l 0 وكم .

# PVSuff-0ah
SFX k Y 11
SFX k 0 كما .
SFX k 0 كم .
SFX k 0 كن .
SFX k 0 هن .
SFX k 0 هم .
SFX k 0 ني .
SFX k 0 هما .
SFX k 0 ه .
SFX k 0 ها .
SFX k 0 ك .
SFX k 0 نا .

# PVSuff-uwA
SFX j Y 1
SFX j 0 وا .

# IVSuff-A
SFX i Y 1
SFX i 0 ا .

# NSuff-iyna
SFX h Y 1
SFX h 0 ين .
